Utah statutes.
63F-1-206.   Rulemaking -- Policies.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the chief information officer
shall make rules that:
(i)  provide standards that impose requirements on executive branch agencies
that:
(A)  are related to the security of the statewide area network; and
(B)  establish standards for when an agency must obtain approval before
obtaining items listed in Subsection 63F-1-205(1);
(ii)  specify the detail and format required in an agency information
technology plan submitted in accordance with Section 63F-1-204;
(iii)  provide for standards related to the privacy policies of websites
operated by or on behalf of an executive branch agency;
(iv)  provide for the acquisition, licensing, and sale of computer software;
(v)  specify the requirements for the project plan and business case analysis
required by Section 63F-1-205;
(vi)  provide for project oversight of agency technology projects when
required by Section 63F-1-205;
(vii)  establish, in accordance with Subsection 63F-1-205(2), the
implementation of the needs assessment for information technology purchases;
and
(viii)  establish telecommunications standards and specifications in
accordance with Section 63F-1-404.
(b)  The rulemaking authority in this Subsection (1) is in addition to any
other rulemaking authority granted by this title.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, and subject to Subsection (2)(b), the chief information officer may adopt
a policy that outlines procedures to be followed by the chief information
officer in facilitating the implementation of this title by executive branch
agencies if the policy:
(i)  is consistent with the executive branch strategic plan; and
(ii)  is not required to be made by rule under Subsection (1) or Section
63G-3-201.
(b) (i)  A policy adopted by the chief information officer under Subsection
(2)(a) may not take effect until 30 days after the day on which the chief
information officer submits the policy to:
(A)  the governor; and
(B)  all cabinet level officials.
(ii)  During the 30-day period described in Subsection (2)(b)(i), cabinet
level officials may review and comment on a policy submitted under Subsection
(2)(b)(i).
(3) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1) or (2) or Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, without following the procedures of Subsection
(1) or (2), the chief information officer may adopt a security procedure to be
followed by executive branch agencies to protect the statewide area network
if:
(i)  broad communication of the security procedure would create a significant
potential for increasing the vulnerability of the statewide area network to
breach or attack; and
(ii)  after consultation with the chief information officer, the governor
agrees that broad communication of the security procedure would create a
significant potential increase in the vulnerability of the statewide area
network to breach or attack.
(b)  A security procedure described in Subsection (3)(a) is classified as a
protected record under Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act.
(c)  The chief information officer shall provide a copy of the security
procedure as a protected record to:
(i)  the chief justice of the Utah Supreme Court for the judicial branch;
(ii)  the speaker of the House of Representatives and the president of the
Senate for the legislative branch;
(iii)  the chair of the Board of Regents; and
(iv)  the chair of the State Board of Education.
